New York, session 2025-2026, A8847.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 1128-a of the education law, as 2 added by chapter 180 of the laws of 2000, is amended to read as follows: 3 2. A report which is made pursuant to this article and does not, after 4 investigation, result in a criminal conviction shall be expunged from 5 any record which may be kept by a school or school district with respect 6 to the subject of such a report after a period of five years from the 7 date of the making of such report or at such earlier time as such 8 school, or school district, as the case may be, determines, provided 9 that such school or school district may retain such records related to 10 alleged misconduct covered by paragraph (f) of subdivision three of 11 section 30.10 of the criminal procedure law or subdivision (b) of 12 section two hundred eight of the civil practice law and rules for the 13 duration of the statute of limitations. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13073-01-5